Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 7
COMMUNITY OR USEFUL PUBLIC SERVICE

16-11-701. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This part 7 was added in 1987. For amendments to this part 7 prior to its repeal in 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this part 7 were relocated to § 18-1.3-507.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this part 7, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.